Utah statutes.
53-3-416.   Driving record and other information to be provided to employer.

(1)  Each person who drives a commercial motor vehicle who has a CDL issued by this state and who is convicted of violating, in any type of motor vehicle, a state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic, other than a parking violation, in this or any other state or jurisdiction, shall notify both the division and his current employer of the conviction within 30 days of the date of conviction.

(2)  A driver shall notify his current employer before the end of the business day following the day he receives notice that:

(a)  his CDL is suspended, revoked, or canceled by any state;

(b)  he loses the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in any state or other jurisdiction for any period; or

(c)  he is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for any period.

(3)  A person who applies to be a commercial motor vehicle driver shall at the time of application provide to the employer the following information for the 10 years prior to the date of application:

(a)  a list of the names and addresses of the applicant's previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle as any part of his employment;

(b)  the dates between which the applicant drove for each employer listed under Subsection (3)(a); and

(c)  the reason the applicant's employment with each employer listed was terminated.

(4) (a)  An applicant shall certify that all information provided under this section is true and complete to the best of his knowledge.

(b)  An employer receiving information under this section may require that an applicant provide additional information.



Amended by Chapter 324, 2010 General Session

